Tennessee, session 114, SB2400.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-3803, is amended by adding
the following new subsection:
(j) This section does not apply to any materials in the Tennessee Electronic
Library created in § 10-1-301.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2400
012146
- 1 -